ext-firefox-thunderbird-seamonkey/british-english-dictionary-darmeth/dictionaries/en-GB.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY seainrotl'ucdhmgpybkfvwSMBACzTKHPLDGRjxNFEJWqVOIYZUéQ-Xáèíóüöñëïôç24êäÉâúà3ãćÁń1086Üî97ûõÖòÓğā‌ō5

ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '

NOSUGGEST !

IGNORE 1234567890

REP 27
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP f gh
REP f ugh
REP gh f
REP ff ugh
REP uf ough
REP uff ough
REP k ch
REP ch k
REP dg j
REP j dg
REP w ugh
REP ness ity
REP leness ility
REP ness ivity
REP eness ity
REP og ogue
REP ck qu
REP ck que
REP eg e.g.
REP ie i.e.
REP t ght
REP ght t
REP ok OK
REP ts ce
REP ce ts

PFX A Y 2
PFX A 0 re [^e]
PFX A 0 re- e
PFX a Y 1
PFX a 0 mis .
PFX I Y 4
PFX I 0 il l
PFX I 0 ir r
PFX I 0 im [bmp]
PFX I 0 in [^blmpr]
PFX c Y 1
PFX c 0 over .
PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 un .
PFX C Y 2
PFX C 0 de [^e]
PFX C 0 de- e
PFX E Y 1
PFX E 0 dis .
PFX F Y 5
PFX F 0 com [bmp]
PFX F 0 co [aeiouh]
PFX F 0 cor r
PFX F 0 col l
PFX F 0 con [^abehilmopru].
PFX K Y 1
PFX K 0 pre .
PFX e Y 1
PFX e 0 out .
PFX f Y 2
PFX f 0 under [^r]
PFX f 0 under- r
PFX ^ Y 1
PFX ^ 0 non- .
PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4 0 trans .

SFX V Y 15
SFX V 0 tive [aio]
SFX V b ptive b
SFX V d sive d
SFX V be ptive be
SFX V e tive ce
SFX V de sive de
SFX V ke cative ke
SFX V e ptive me
SFX V e ive [st]e
SFX V e ative [^bcdkmst]e
SFX V 0 lative [aeiou]l
SFX V 0 ative [^aeiou]l
SFX V 0 ive [st]
SFX V y icative y
SFX V 0 ative [^abdeilosty]
SFX v Y 15
SFX v 0 tively [aio]
SFX v b ptively b
SFX v d sively d
SFX v be ptively be
SFX v e tively ce
SFX v de sively de
SFX v ke catively ke
SFX v e ptively me
SFX v e ively [st]e
SFX v e atively [^bcdkmst]e
SFX v 0 latively [aeiou]l
SFX v 0 atively [^aeiou]l
SFX v 0 ively [st]
SFX v y icatively y
SFX v 0 atively [^abdeilosty]
SFX u Y 15
SFX u 0 tiveness [aio]
SFX u b ptiveness b
SFX u d siveness d
SFX u be ptiveness be
SFX u e tiveness ce
SFX u de siveness de
SFX u ke cativeness ke
SFX u e ptiveness me
SFX u e iveness [st]e
SFX u e ativeness [^bcdkmst]e
SFX u 0 lativeness [aeiou]l
SFX u 0 ativeness [^aeiou]l
SFX u 0 iveness [st]
SFX u y icativeness y
SFX u 0 ativeness [^abdeilosty]
SFX N Y 34
SFX N b ption b
SFX N d sion d
SFX N be ption be
SFX N e tion ce
SFX N de sion de
SFX N ke cation ke
SFX N e ption ume
SFX N e mation [^u]me
SFX N e ion [^i]cise
SFX N e ion [tfl]use
SFX N e ion [rsn]se
SFX N e ion ulse
SFX N e ion [v]ise
SFX N e ition ose
SFX N e ation [iou]te
SFX N e ion [^iou]te
SFX N e ation [^emnx][rc]ise
SFX N e ation [btv][e][rc]ise
SFX N e ation [^bcdkmst]e
SFX N e ation [^uriolsna][^bcdkmztrlvgu]e
SFX N e ation [^crbv][mi][^bcdkmztrlvgun]e
SFX N el ulsion el
SFX N 0 lation [aiou]l
SFX N 0 ation [^aeiou]l
SFX N 0 mation [aeiou]m
SFX N 0 ation [^aeiou]m
SFX N er ration er
SFX N 0 ation [^e]r
SFX N 0 ion [sx]
SFX N t ssion mit
SFX N 0 ion [^m]it
SFX N 0 ation [^i]t
SFX N y ication y
SFX N 0 ation [^bdelmrstxy]
SFX n Y 42
SFX n 0 tion a
SFX n e tion ce
SFX n ke cation ke
SFX n e ation [iou]te
SFX n e ion [^iou]te
SFX n e ation [^ckt]e
SFX n el ulsion el
SFX n 0 lation [aiou]l
SFX n 0 ation [^aeiou]l
SFX n er ration er
SFX n 0 ation [^e]r
SFX n y ation py
SFX n y ication [^p]y
SFX n 0 ation [^aelry]
SFX n 0 tions a
SFX n 0 tion's a
SFX n e tions ce
SFX n e tion's ce
SFX n ke cations ke
SFX n ke cation's ke
SFX n e ations [iou]te
SFX n e ation's [iou]te
SFX n e ions [^iou]te
SFX n e ion's [^iou]te
SFX n e ations [^ckt]e
SFX n e ation's [^ckt]e
SFX n el ulsions el
SFX n el ulsion's el
SFX n 0 lations [aiou]l
SFX n 0 lation's [aiou]l
SFX n 0 ations [^aeiou]l
SFX n 0 ation's [^aeiou]l
SFX n er rations er
SFX n er ration's er
SFX n 0 ations [^e]r
SFX n 0 ation's [^e]r
SFX n y ations py
SFX n y ation's py
SFX n y ications [^p]y
SFX n y ication's [^p]y
SFX n 0 ations [^aelry]
SFX n 0 ation's [^aelry]
SFX X Y 26
SFX X b ptions b
SFX X d sions d
SFX X be ptions be
SFX X e tions ce
SFX X ke cations ke
SFX X de sions de
SFX X e ptions ume
SFX X e mations [^u]me
SFX X e ions [^o]se
SFX X e itions ose
SFX X e ations [iou]te
SFX X e ions [^iou]te
SFX X e ations [^bcdkmst]e
SFX X el ulsions el
SFX X 0 lations [aiou]l
SFX X 0 ations [^aeiou]l
SFX X 0 mations [aeiou]m
SFX X 0 ations [^aeiou]m
SFX X er rations er
SFX X 0 ations [^e]r
SFX X 0 ions [sx]
SFX X t ssions mit
SFX X 0 ions [^m]it
SFX X 0 ations [^i]t
SFX X y ications y
SFX X 0 ations [^bdelmrstxy]
SFX x Y 40
SFX x b ptional b
SFX x d sional d
SFX x be ptional be
SFX x e tional ce
SFX x ke cational ke
SFX x de sional de
SFX x e ional [^o]se
SFX x e itional ose
SFX x e ional te
SFX x e ational [^bcdkst]e
SFX x el ulsional el
SFX x 0 lational [aiou]l
SFX x 0 ational [^aeiou]l
SFX x er rational er
SFX x 0 ational [^e]r
SFX x 0 ional [sx]
SFX x 0 ional [^n]t
SFX x 0 ational nt
SFX x y icational y
SFX x 0 ational [^bdelrstxy]
SFX x b ptionally b
SFX x d sionally d
SFX x be ptionally be
SFX x e tionally ce
SFX x ke cationally ke
SFX x de sionally de
SFX x e ionally [^o]se
SFX x e itionally ose
SFX x e ionally te
SFX x e ationally [^bcdkst]e
SFX x el ulsionally el
SFX x 0 lationally [aiou]l
SFX x 0 ationally [^aeiou]l
SFX x er rationally er
SFX x 0 ationally [^e]r
SFX x 0 ionally [sx]
SFX x 0 ionally [^n]t
SFX x 0 ationally nt
SFX x y icationally y
SFX x 0 ationally [^bdelrstxy]
SFX H N 13
SFX H y ieth y
SFX H ree ird ree
SFX H ve fth ve
SFX H e th [^ev]e
SFX H 0 h t
SFX H 0 th [^ety]
SFX H y ieths y
SFX H ree irds ree
SFX H ve fths ve
SFX H e ths [^ev]e
SFX H 0 hs t
SFX H 0 ths [^ety]
SFX H 0 fold .
SFX Y Y 9
SFX Y 0 ally ic
SFX Y 0 ly [^i]c
SFX Y e y [^aeiou]le
SFX Y 0 ly [aeiou]le
SFX Y 0 ly [^l]e
SFX Y 0 y [^aeiou]l
SFX Y y ily [^aeiou]y
SFX Y 0 ly [aeiou][ly]
SFX Y 0 ly [^cely]
SFX G Y 24
SFX G e ing [^eioy]e
SFX G 0 ing [eoy]e
SFX G ie ying ie
SFX G 0 bing [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX G 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX G 0 ding [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX G 0 fing [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX G 0 ging [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX G 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX G 0 ling [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX G 0 ing [aeio][eiou]l
SFX G 0 ling [^aeo]al
SFX G 0 ing [aeo]al
SFX G 0 ming [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX G 0 ning [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX G 0 ping [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX G 0 ring [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX G 0 sing [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX G 0 ting [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX G 0 ving [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX G 0 zing [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX G 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX G 0 ing [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX G 0 ing [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX J Y 25
SFX J e ings [^eioy]e
SFX J 0 ings [eoy]e
SFX J ie yings ie
SFX J 0 bings [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX J 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX J 0 dings [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX J 0 fings [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX J 0 gings [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX J 0 kings [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX J 0 lings [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX J 0 ings [aeio][eiou]l
SFX J 0 lings [^aeo]al
SFX J 0 ings [aeo]al
SFX J 0 mings [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX J 0 nings [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX J 0 pings [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX J 0 rings [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX J 0 sings [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX J 0 tings [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX J 0 vings [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX J 0 zings [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX J 0 ings [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX J 0 ings [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX J 0 ings [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX J 0 ings [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX k Y 8
SFX k e ingly [^eioy]e
SFX k 0 ingly [eoy]e
SFX k ie yingly ie
SFX k 0 kingly [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX k 0 lingly [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX k 0 ingly [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX k 0 ingly [^aeiou][cl]
SFX k 0 ingly [^ecl]
SFX D Y 25
SFX D 0 d [^e]e
SFX D e d ee
SFX D 0 bed [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX D 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX D 0 ded [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX D 0 fed [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX D 0 ged [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX D 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX D 0 led [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX D 0 ed [aeio][eiou]l
SFX D 0 led [^aeo]al
SFX D 0 ed [aeo]al
SFX D 0 med [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX D 0 ned [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX D 0 ped [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX D 0 red [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX D 0 sed [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX D 0 ted [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX D 0 ved [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX D 0 zed [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX D y ied [^aeiou]y
SFX D 0 ed [aeiou]y
SFX D 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX D 0 ed [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX D 0 ed [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
