ext-firefox-thunderbird-seamonkey/british-english-dictionary-darmeth/dictionaries/en-GB.dic
ace/MRDSGNVvun
action/IS4A
adobe/XVNv
affect/vhgGVXSDNki
aggress/XuNVv
allude/uGXSDvVN
amplify/NGRDSX
amuse/LGhkDS
am/vyVu
animation/AM
appearance/ASE
appellate/XvVN
appreciably/I
apprehends/a
approved/U
app/SMOY
arterialise/n
aspire/SDXNG
aster/EMSF
attire/SDG
attract/uGV7SDv
audition/GMD
autosuggest/Vb
behave/aGSD
bewitch/kDSyG
bids/fce
birth/AGMDS
blocking/MU
bluff/SYDG
boldface/SDG
bonk/DSG
borrow/RGJDS
box's/e
bracing/f
buffs/AC
bust/FGDS
cant/ADIC
capably/I
captive/MNS
carbonise/CDSNG
careful/c
carp/kSMDOGJ
carrying/a
caste/e
causa/VnovO
caution/SKy
certify/DSNXGl7
charging/EcAf
chastise/DSG
cheep/DSG
chip/SMZJDG
clasp/SUDG
class's/f
clumsy/TY
codes/aC
collaborate/XSDvVGN
commence/ADSG
communicate/SDuByVNGXv
communise/n
comparability/I
complex/SYNX
composite/SYMx
comprehend/NVDuXGbvS
compressor/CSM
computerise/N
concert/GEDS
conclude/VNSDuGvX
condition/AGSDK
confident/Yc
conflict/SDMkVG
congruous/YI
conjugate/VNGxSDX
conserve/NVnuv
constrained/U
consult/nSDNG
contemplate/DvunVNG
continental/4
convict/DMSVG
cook/cSGDK
corrigibly/I
corroborate/vGNVyDSX
corrode/uSDbVNvXG
counted/EAfaU
counting/fEa
count's/EA
create/VGNnSDuv
creation/AS
credible/IY
cries/eC
culminate/SDXGN
cussing/F
c/XN
dated/eU
deafen/dkS
deal/RGJS
declare/SDGvyVNn
decorous/IY
delude/XkGvVNSD
denominate/x
denuclearise/NGSD
describe/uVNvDX
deserving/U
desiderate/VN
despair/MDSGk
destined/K
detribalise/GSDN
diagnosis/a
digestible/I
digitalis/n
disbelieve/k
discrete/YNX
divide/VNvSDMGuX
dizzy/kTSDYG
dominated/K
done/FfcUeA
draft's/c
drew/ce
dwelt/I
ease/EGSD
economic/UYO
edge/ZMGp2DS
educate/BnDSxGNVy
effect/uGVvSMD
eight/HSZM
elude/GSDVNvu
emanate/SDXVNG
emerge/GSD
emotional/cU
enquire/RGDSZk
entanglement/E
equivalent/YS
esteem/a
eur/F
exacerbate/NGXDS
except/DSxGV
exhaust/upvSVGbDhk
expect/hiDnGl7SN
explore/VNynDSRG
export/NBDRSG
exposure/Sf
express/DSYXMuNGVvb
extends/c
face/eSDCKG
facer/K
familiarly/U
famous/IY
fell/D7GS
fenestrate/CDN
fer's/4
fifth/MY
figure/FSDKE4G
find/GRJ7MS
firming/F
fit's/ae
five/SMH
fixing/K4
fluidise/n
forma/nvuoVO
formation/CO4SFM
former/IM4S
form/FNI4DSAGC
forming/K
fortify/GXDSN
four/SHM
foxing/e
frown/DGSk
fulfilled/U
function/oGySMDOp
fusing/AM4
ga/FS
gather/dJS
gaze/MGDS
gendered/a4
generates/AC
germinate/SDXGN
godless/Y
goes/fe
gradate/DSxG
grew/cAe
guess/eGSD
guise/EDSMG
hand/fiD
handles/a
hipped/4
hoard/SJRGMD
hoick/GSD
hospitable/IY
hundred/HMS
idee/xN
ify/CAU
incant/NX
inclined/E
incline/MGNDn
include/bGuXDSvNV
increase/k
indicate/XDSvyNGV
informs/a
ingress/uSNV
inspire/VNkDGxn
insular/Y
intensify/GNSD
interject/xGyDS
invent/vuyGV
invest/EGADS
ionises/C
iterate/NGVASDvX
jab/GSMD
join/AGFSD
judges/K
juxtapose/NXSDG
knowing/UY
labour/Sc
lay/feSCAca
legitimise/nGNSD
lie/fGcS
like/PMYGDS7J
lineate/CN
locate/ESDFGNXA
locating/MA
location/4
lucre/Vuv
manned/cfe
mast/E
matched/U
menstrual/K
mischievous/Y
mock/SkDMG
moderate/IYN
monitory/K
morn/SJG
motions/CF
motive/nSpNxM
mounting/AM
moves/FA
mumble/GSDJ
mutable/4FI
nationals/4
nine/HRMS
n/NVxnv
normalise/n
nourished/fU
objectify/NGXSD
observe/nxRGDSlN
operation's/F
orient/ANEDSG
o's/aF
pacing/e
packed/K
pair/ADGIS
palliate/SDVNG
participate/nDSNGVy
partisan/U
parts/fCI
patriots/F
payment/fScAK
pens/vXNVu
peril/SIDG
phrase/OSDMGJ
plant/4SIGDN
popularise/n
port's/4AI
positing/F
potential/YS
powers/c
prepared/fU
preserve/XNV
profess/NGSDhxX
prostitute/DSGM
protect/vuDVGS
prudent/IY
pubescent/K
purpose/jp6SDVGYMv
quire/ISA
raging/e
railroad/SGDM
rave/MRGJDS
reaching/ec
reference/CGS
remunerate/VNGSD
reply/MXN
reports/a
represented/U
reprove/k
repulse/uVv
reserve/3nMhN
respect/jESDBG6
respondent/FSM
rotate/SDGx
ruminate/XSDvVNG
salubrious/I
saturation/c
scaffold/MSJG
schools/K
select/ACGSKD
sells/fKce
semiconscious/Y
seven/MHS
shipping/4
shoots/fc
side/fSeMI
sign/FDCASG
simulate/nVNGSD
six/MSH
slay/RSGJ
slick/GTSYD
spoils/C
sprayed/U
ss/K
statement/aSfc
stayed/e
stored/A
strict/AF
stultify/GSDkN
succeed/GDS
suffer/rSdJ7
suggest/SDbuvGV
surmountable/I
tabularise/n
tasteless/Y
ten/HMgl7S
tens/STDXG
thousand/HSM
three/HSM
throwing/Mc
til/EGD
tiller/ES
tracklist/MSGJ
transmigrate/N
trite/FY
trusted/aE
unions/A
use/fDScAGaE
vary/SDBhklG
visions/K
visited/U
vitalising/AC
vulgar/QYq
waitress/MSG
worn/Ue
